Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 8
UNCLAIMED FUNDS FOR OVERCHARGES

Section

40-8-101. Undistributed overcharges turned over to municipality.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in all cases where there has been an overcharge by a public utility for any commodity or service on account of which rights to refunds have accrued to any municipality or the inhabitants thereof by reason of services or commodities received through the use of the streets of such municipality, with or without a franchise, and a refund of the amount overcharged has been directed by any court or other authorized governmental tribunal, and a part of such refund has not been made because of inability to find the persons entitled thereto within the time limit fixed by such court or tribunal, the court or tribunal shall direct that any such undistributed balance shall be turned over to the municipality.

For gas, electric, and steam utilities, the public utilities commission may order that all or part of the undistributed balance of a refund be paid by the utility in an equitable manner to the general body of utility customers, and the public utilities commission may order a gas or electric utility to pay up to ninety percent of the undistributed balance of a refund into the fund established by the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance pursuant to section 40-8.5-104.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 704, § 1.

CSA:

C. 137, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 115-8-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-8-1.

L. 69:

p. 954, § 52.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1760, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 2137, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3507, § 17, effective September 7.

40-8-102. Undistributed balance to county commissioners - when.

Subject to the provisions of section 40-8-101, in all cases where rights to refunds from a similar overcharge have accrued to the inhabitants of any county, outside of a municipality therein, the undistributed balance shall be turned over to the county commissioners of such county.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 704, § 2.

CSA:

C. 137, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 115-8-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-8-2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1761, § 3, effective May 31.

40-8-103. Due and payable by escheat.

The payment to such municipality or county, as set forth in sections 40-8-101 and 40-8-102, shall become due and payable by escheat, where not otherwise due and payable by operation of law.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 704, § 3.

CSA:

C. 137, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 115-8-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-8-3.

40-8-104. Municipality or county liable for three years.

The municipality or county receiving such moneys shall be liable therefor for three years from the date when received and shall pay them out to any person entitled thereto proving his claim through court action or in any other method satisfactory to the municipality or county. At the end of such period, the fund shall become the property of the municipality or county.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 704, § 4.

CSA:

C. 137, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 115-8-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-8-4.

40-8-105. Authority of commission unaffected.

Except as provided in section 40-8-101 (2), nothing in this article shall affect the authority of the public utilities commission, as otherwise provided by law, to determine the manner in which overcharges by a public utility shall be returned to the customers of that utility.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1761, § 4, effective May 31.